test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PROG-yi-itsiy_cry_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - itsiy[cry] :
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjSg1:       yistsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjSg2:       yítsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjSg3:       yitsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1:       [yiìtsíł, yaàtsíł]
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1+Distr: [dàyiìtsíł, dàyaàtsíł]
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2:       yastsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2+Distr: dàyastsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3:       gátsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3+Distr: dàgátsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4:       ts'átsíł
    itsiy+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4+Distr: dàts'átsíł
